Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1517
Department; expenditure of funds authorized.

The department may expend funds for the administration of the Disabled Persons and Family Support Act and for support pursuant to the act.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 17;

Laws 1990, LB 917, § 1.